Washington statutes.
RCW 39.89.030

Authority—Conditions.

A local government may finance public improvements using community revitalization financing subject to the following conditions:

(1) The local government adopts an ordinance designating an increment area within its boundaries and specifying the public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part with the use of community revitalization financing;

(2) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using community revitalization financing are expected to encourage private development within the increment area and to increase the fair market value of real property within the increment area;

(3) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the increment area, as a result of the public improvements, will be consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(4) Taxing districts, in the aggregate, that levy at least seventy-five percent of the regular property tax within which the increment area is located approves the community revitalization financing of the project under RCW 39.89.050(1); and

(5) In an increment area that includes any portion of a fire protection district as defined in Title 52 RCW, the fire protection district must agree to participate in the community revitalization financing of the project under chapter 212, Laws of 2001, for the project to proceed. Approval by the fire protection district shall be considered as part of the required participation by taxing districts under subsection (4) of this section.

[ 2002 c 12 s 1; 2001 c 212 s 3.]